Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2651.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2723HZ (2) 91 th/ns H.F. 2651 Section 1. Section 321E.29B, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. Notwithstanding section 321E.8 , the department 3 permit-issuing authority may issue annual permits for the 4 operation of vehicles or combinations of vehicles transporting 5 fluid milk products to or from a milk plant, receiving 6 station, or transfer station, exceeding the weight limitation 7 of section 321.463 but not exceeding a gross weight of 8 ninety-six one hundred thirty-six thousand pounds , on primary 9 roads and primary road extensions in cities . The department 10 shall establish rules regarding minimum distances for axle 11 configurations. 12 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect January 1, 13 2027. 14